Hawaii, session 2026, HB271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I, subpart A, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Teacher, faculty, and student prayers.  (a)  Each educational institution with students in grade kindergarten, grade six, or any intervening grade shall authorize the school's faculty and staff to provide, on a weekly or more frequent basis, time and space for students to engage in student-led group prayer or individual student prayer; provided that: (1)  No student of an educational institution shall be compelled, against the student's objections or the objections of the student's parent or guardian, to participate in prayer; (2)  No teacher or staff member of an educational institution shall admonish, discipline, or harass a student based on the student's participation or non-participation in prayer; and (3)  No teacher or staff member of an educational institution shall be admonished, disciplined, or harassed for either deciding or declining to supervise any location in which students are praying. (b) A copy of this section shall be posted in a conspicuous location at each educational institution that is subject to this section. (c)  The department shall adopt rules under chapter 91 to carry out the purposes of this section." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________